test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-puuol_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pūol: # Noun 216 'eng /est pool/fin' - full paradigm
     pūol+N+Sg+Nom: pūol
     pūol+N+Sg+Gen: pūol
     pūol+N+Sg+Par: pūoldõ
     pūol+N+Sg+Dat: pūolõn
     pūol+N+Sg+Ins: pūolkõks
     pūol+N+Sg+Ill: pūolõ
     pūol+N+Sg+Ela: pūolstõ
     pūol+N+Pl+Nom: pūold
     pūol+N+Pl+Gen: pūold
     pūol+N+Pl+Par: pūoļi
     pūol+N+Pl+Dat: pūolõn
     pūol+N+Pl+Ins: pūolkõks
     pūol+N+Pl+Ill: pūoļiž
     pūol+N+Pl+Ela: pūoļšti
